Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB186.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 48.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A branch budget recommendation shall be submitted to the General Assembly by
the Governor for the executive branch, including a separate recommendation for
the Transportation Cabinet, the Chief Justice for the judicial branch, and the
Legislative Research Commission for the legislative branch. The budget
recommendations shall be submitted to the General Assembly on or before the tenth
legislative day of each even-numbered-year regular session, except in the year
following the election of a new Governor when the budget recommendations shall
be submitted not later than the fifteenth legislative day of an even-numbered-year
regular session.
(2) Budget recommendations shall be submitted on the first day of any extraordinary
session called for the purpose of amending a branch budget bill.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2026 10:35 AM Jacketed